North Dakota statutes. TITLE 45 Partnerships
CHAPTER 45-10.2 Uniform Limited Partnership Act
45-10.2-64. (703)
Charging order.

On application by a judgment creditor of a partner or of a partner’s transferee, and following notice to the partnership of the application, a court of competent jurisdiction may enter a charging order against the transferable interest of the judgment debtor for the unsatisfied amount of the judgment.

A charging order constitutes a lien on the transferable interest of the judgment debtor and requires the partnership to pay to the person to which the charging order was issued any distribution that otherwise would be paid to the judgment debtor.

The partner or transferee having a transferable interest subject to a charging order may extinguish the charging order by satisfying the judgment and filing a certified copy of the satisfaction with the court that issued the charging order.

A partnership or partner having any transferable interest not subject to the charging order may pay the full amount due under the judgment to the judgment creditor and succeed to the rights of the judgment creditor, including the charging order.

This chapter does not deprive any partner or transferee of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable to the transferable interest of the partner or transferee.

This section provides the exclusive remedy by which a person seeking to enforce a judgment against a partner or transferee may satisfy, in the capacity of a judgment creditor, the judgment from the transferable interest of the judgment debtor.

No other remedy, including foreclosure of the transferable interest or a court order for directions, accounts, and inquiries the debtor partner may have made, is available to the judgment creditor attempting to satisfy the judgment from the judgment debtor’s interest in the partnership.

No creditor of a partner or transferee has a right to obtain possession or otherwise exercise legal or equitable remedies with respect to property of the partnership.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2009, ch. 106, § 64; 2017, ch. 82, § 7, effective August 1, 2017.

45-10.2-65. (704)
Power of estate of deceased partner.

If a partner dies, then the personal representative or other legal representative of the deceased partner may exercise the rights of a transferee as provided in section 45-10.2-63 and, for the purposes of settling the estate, may exercise the rights of a current limited partner under section 45-10.2-34.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-66. (801)
Nonjudicial dissolution.

Except as otherwise provided in section 45-10.2-67, a limited partnership is dissolved, and its activities must be wound up, only upon the occurrence of any of the following:

The happening of an event specified in the partnership agreement;

The consent of all general partners and of limited partners owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions as limited partners at the time the consent is to be effective;

After the dissociation of a person as a general partner:

If the limited partnership has at least one remaining general partner, then the consent to dissolve the limited partnership given within ninety days after the dissociation by partners owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions as partners at the time the consent is to be effective; or

If the limited partnership does not have a remaining general partner, then the passage of ninety days after the dissociation unless before the end of the period:

Consent to continue the activities of the limited partnership and admit at least one general partner is given by limited partners owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions as limited partners at the time the consent is to be effective; and

At least one person is admitted as a general partner in accordance with the consent;

The passage of ninety days after the dissociation of the last limited partner of the limited partnership, unless before the end of the period the limited partnership admits at least one limited partner; or

The issuing and filing of a notice of dissolution by the secretary of state under subsection 5 of section 45-10.2-108.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-67. (802)
Judicial dissolution.

On application by a partner the district court may order dissolution of a limited partnership if it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the activities of the limited partnership in conformity with the partnership agreement.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

Collateral References.

Inability of partnership to operate at profit as justification for court-ordered dissolution, 20 A.L.R.4th 122.

45-10.2-68. (803)
Winding up.

A limited partnership continues after dissolution only for the purpose of winding up its activities.

In winding up its activities, the limited partnership:

May:

Amend its certificate of limited partnership to state that the limited partnership is dissolved;

Preserve the limited partnership business or property as a going concern for a reasonable time;

Prosecute and defend actions and proceedings, whether civil, criminal, or administrative;

Transfer the property of the limited partnership;

Settle disputes by mediation or arbitration;

File a statement of termination as provided in section 45-10.2-69; and

Perform other necessary acts; and

Shall:

Discharge the liabilities of the limited partnership;

Settle and close the activities of the limited partnership; and

Marshall and distribute the assets of the partnership.

If a dissolved limited partnership does not have a general partner, then a person to wind up the activities of the dissolved limited partnership may be appointed by the consent of limited partners owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions as limited partners at the time the consent is to be effective. A person appointed under this subsection:

Has the powers of a general partner under section 45-10.2-70; and

Shall promptly amend the certificate of limited partnership to state:

That the limited partnership does not have a general partner;

The name of the person that has been appointed to wind up the limited partnership; and

The street and mailing address of the person.

On the application of any partner, the district court may order judicial supervision of the winding up, including the appointment of a person to wind up the activities of the dissolved limited partnership, if:

A limited partnership does not have a general partner and within a reasonable time following the dissolution no person has been appointed pursuant to subsection 3; or

The applicant establishes other good cause.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-69. (203)
Statement of termination.

A dissolved limited partnership that has completed winding up may deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of termination that states:

The name of the limited partnership; and

Any other information as determined by the general partners filing the statement or by a person appointed pursuant to subsection 3 or 4 of section 45-10.2-68.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-70. (804)
Power of general partner and person dissociated as general partner to bind partnership after dissolution.

A limited partnership is bound by an act of a general partner after dissolution which:

Is appropriate for winding up the activities of a limited partnership; or

Would have bound the limited partnership under section 45-10.2-38 before dissolution, if, at the time the other party enters into the transaction, the other party does not have notice of the dissolution.

A person dissociated as a general partner binds a limited partnership through an act occurring after dissolution if:

At the time the other party enters into the transaction:

Less than two years have passed since the dissociation; and

The other party does not have notice of the dissociation and reasonably believes that the person is a general partner; and

The act:

Is appropriate for winding up the activities of the limited partnership; or

Would have bound the limited partnership under section 45-10.2-38 before dissolution and at the time the other party enters into the transaction the other party does not have notice of the dissolution.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-71. (805)
Liability after dissolution of general partner and person dissociated as general partner to limited partnership, other general partners, and persons dissociated as general partner.

If a general partner having knowledge of the dissolution causes a limited partnership to incur an obligation under subsection 1 of section 45-10.2-70 by an act that is not appropriate for winding up the activities of the partnership, then the general partner is liable:

To the limited partnership for any damage caused to the limited partnership arising from the obligation; and

If another general partner or a person dissociated as a general partner is liable for the obligation, then to that other general partner or person for any damage caused to that other general partner or person arising from the liability.

If a person dissociated as a general partner causes a limited partnership to incur an obligation under subsection 2 of section 45-10.2-70, then the person is liable:

To the limited partnership for any damage caused to the limited partnership arising from the obligation; and

If a general partner or another person dissociated as a general partner is liable for the obligation, then to the general partner or other person for any damage caused to the general partner or other person arising from the liability.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-72. (806)
Known claims against dissolved limited partnership.

A dissolved limited partnership may dispose of the known claims against it by following the procedure described in subsection 2.

A dissolved limited partnership may notify its known claimants of the dissolution in a record. The notice must:

Specify the information required to be included in a claim;

Provide a mailing address to which the claim is to be sent;

State the deadline for receipt of the claim, which may not be less than one hundred twenty days after the date the notice is received by the claimant;

State that the claim will be barred if not received by the deadline; and

Unless the limited partnership has been at each moment during its existence a limited liability limited partnership, state that the barring of a claim against the limited partnership will also bar any corresponding claim against any general partner or person dissociated as a general partner which is based on section 45-10.2-40.

A claim against a dissolved limited partnership is barred if the requirements of subsection 2 are met and:

The claim is not received by the specified deadline; or

In the case of a claim that is timely received but rejected by the dissolved limited partnership, the claimant does not commence an action to enforce the claim against the limited partnership within ninety days after the receipt of the notice of the rejection.

This section does not apply to a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution or a liability that is contingent on that date.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-73. (807)
Other claims against dissolved limited partnerships.

A dissolved limited partnership may publish notice of its dissolution and request persons having claims against the limited partnership to present them in accordance with the notice.

The notice must:

Be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the principal executive office of the dissolved limited partnership is located or, if it has none in this state, in the county in which the principal executive office of the limited partnership is or was last located;

Describe the information required to be contained in a claim and provide a mailing address to which the claim is to be sent;

State that a claim against the limited partnership is barred unless an action to enforce the claim is commenced within five years after publication of the notice; and

Unless the limited partnership has been at each moment during its existence a limited liability limited partnership under chapter 45-23, state that the barring of a claim against the limited partnership will also bar any corresponding claim against any general partner or person dissociated as a general partner which is based on section 45-10.2-40.

If a dissolved limited partnership publishes a notice in accordance with subsection 2, then the claim of each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences an action to enforce the claim against the dissolved limited partnership within five years after the publication date of the notice:

A claimant that did not receive notice in a record under section 45-10.2-72;

A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the dissolved limited partnership but not acted on; and

A claimant whose claim is contingent or based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

A claim not barred under this section may be enforced:

Against the dissolved limited partnership, to the extent of its undistributed assets;

If the assets have been distributed in liquidation, then against a partner or transferee to the extent of the proportionate share of the claim of that person or the assets of the limited partnership distributed to the partner or transferee in liquidation, whichever is less, but the total liability of a person for all claims under this subdivision does not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the person as part of the winding up of the dissolved limited partnership; or

Against any person liable on the claim under section 45-10.2-40.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-74. (808)
Liability of general partner and person dissociated as general partner when claim against limited partnership barred.

If a claim against a dissolved limited partnership is barred under section 45-10.2-72 or 45-10.2-73, then any corresponding claim under section 45-10.2-40 is also barred.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-75. (812)
Disposition of assets — When contributions required.

In winding up the activities of a limited partnership, the assets of the limited partnership, including the contributions required by this section, must be applied to satisfy the obligations to creditors of the limited partnership, including, to the extent permitted by law, partners that are creditors.

Any surplus remaining after the limited partnership complies with subsection 1 must be paid in cash as a distribution.

If assets of a limited partnership are insufficient to satisfy all of its obligations under subsection 1, then with respect to each unsatisfied obligation incurred when the limited partnership was not a limited liability limited partnership under chapter 45-23, the following rules apply:

Each person that was a general partner when the obligation was incurred and that has not been released from the obligation under section 45-10.2-61 shall contribute to the limited partnership for the purpose of enabling the limited partnership to satisfy the obligation. The contribution due from each of those persons is in proportion to the right to receive distributions in the capacity of general partner in effect for each of those persons when the obligation was incurred.

If a person does not contribute the full amount required under subdivision a with respect to an unsatisfied obligation of the limited partnership, then the other persons required to contribute by subdivision a on account of the obligation shall contribute the additional amount necessary to discharge the obligation. The additional contribution due from each of those other persons is in proportion to the right to receive distributions in the capacity of general partner in effect for each of those other persons when the obligation was incurred.

If a person does not make the additional contribution required by subdivision b, then further additional contributions are determined and due in the same manner as provided in subdivision b.

A person that makes an additional contribution under subdivision b or c of subsection 3 may recover from any person whose failure to contribute under subdivision a or b of subsection 3 necessitated the additional contribution.

A person may not recover under this subsection more than the amount additionally contributed.

The liability of a person under this subsection may not exceed the amount the person failed to contribute.

The estate of a deceased individual is liable for the obligations of the person under this section.

An assignee for the benefit of creditors of a limited partnership or a partner, or a person appointed by a court to represent creditors of a limited partnership or a partner, may enforce the obligation to contribute by a person under subsection 3.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-76. (901)
Foreign limited partnership — Governing law.

The laws of the state or other jurisdiction under which a foreign limited partnership is organized govern relations among the partners of the foreign limited partnership and between the partners and the foreign limited partnership and the liability of partners as partners for an obligation of the foreign limited partnership.

A foreign limited partnership may not be denied a certificate of authority by reason of any difference between the laws of the jurisdiction under which the foreign limited partnership is organized and the laws of this state.

A certificate of authority does not authorize a foreign limited partnership to engage in any business or exercise any power that a limited partnership may not engage in or exercise in this state.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-77. (905)
Foreign limited partnership — Name.

A foreign limited partnership whose name does not comply with section 45-10.2-10 may not obtain a certificate of authority until it adopts, for the purpose of transacting business in this state, an alternate name that complies with section 45-10.2-10. A foreign limited partnership that adopts an alternate name under this subsection and then obtains a certificate of authority with the name shall comply with chapter 45-11. After obtaining a certificate of authority with an alternate name, a foreign limited partnership shall transact business in this state under the alternate name unless the foreign limited partnership is authorized under section 45-10.2-10 to transact business in this state under another name.

If a foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business in this state changes its name to one that does not comply with section 45-10.2-10, then it may not thereafter transact business in this state until it complies with subsection 1 and obtains an amended certificate of authority.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-78.
Foreign limited partnership — Admission of foreign limited partnership — Transacting business — Obtaining licenses and permits.

A foreign limited partnership may not:

Transact business in this state or obtain any license or permit required by this state until the foreign limited partnership obtains a certificate of authority from the secretary of state.

Transact in this state any business that is prohibited to a limited partnership organized under this chapter.

Be denied a certificate of authority because the laws of the jurisdiction of origin of the foreign limited partnership differ from the laws of this state.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-79. (902)
Foreign limited partnership — Application for certificate of authority.

A foreign limited partnership may apply for a certificate of authority to transact business or conduct activities in this state by delivering an application to the secretary of state for filing. The application must state:

The name of the foreign limited partnership and, if the name does not comply with section 45-10.2-10, then an alternate name adopted pursuant to subsection 1 of section 45-10.2-77;

The name of the state or other jurisdiction under whose law the foreign limited partnership is organized;

The general character of the business the foreign limited partnership proposes to transact in this state;

The street and mailing address of the principal executive office of the foreign limited partnership;

The name of the registered agent as provided in chapter 10-01.1 and, if a noncommercial registered agent, the address of that noncommercial registered agent in this state;

The name, street address, and mailing address of each general partner of the foreign limited partnership; and

Whether the foreign limited partnership is a foreign limited liability limited partnership.

With the completed application, the foreign limited partnership shall deliver a certificate of existence or a record of similar import signed by the secretary of state or other official having custody of the publicly filed records of the foreign limited partnership in the state or other jurisdiction under whose law the foreign limited partnership is organized.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2007, ch. 99, § 62.

45-10.2-80. (904)
Foreign limited partnership — Filing of certificate of authority application.

If the secretary of state finds an application for a certificate of authority conforms to law and all fees have been paid, then the secretary of state shall:

Endorse on the application the word “filed” and the date of filing; and

File the application and the certificate of good standing or certificate of existence.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2007, ch. 99, § 63.

45-10.2-81.
Foreign limited partnership — Amendments to the certificate of authority.

If any statement in the application for a certificate of authority by a foreign limited partnership is false when made or becomes false due to changed circumstances, or if the foreign limited partnership changes its name or purposes sought in this state, then the foreign limited partnership shall file with the secretary of state an application for an amended certificate of authority signed by at least one general partner correcting the statement and, in the case of a change in the name of the foreign limited partnership, a certificate to that effect authenticated by the proper officer of the jurisdiction under the laws of which the foreign limited partnership is organized.

In the case of a dissolution, a foreign limited partnership need not file an application for an amended certificate of authority but shall promptly file with the secretary of state a certificate to that effect authenticated by the proper officer of the jurisdiction under the laws of which the foreign limited partnership is organized.

A foreign limited partnership that changes its name and applies for an amended certificate of authority and which is the owner of a service mark, trademark, or trade name, is a general partner named in a fictitious name certificate, is a general partner in another limited partnership or limited liability limited partnership, or is a managing partner in a limited liability partnership that is on file with the secretary of state, shall change the name of the foreign limited partnership in each of the foregoing registrations that is applicable when the foreign limited partnership files an application for an amended certificate of authority.

A foreign limited partnership shall report any change of address of the principal executive office to the secretary of state and need not file an application for amended certificate of authority.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2007, ch. 101, § 71; 2009, ch. 106, § 65.

45-10.2-82.
Foreign limited partnership — Registered agent — Registered office.

A foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business in this state shall continuously maintain a registered agent as provided in chapter 10-01.1 and, if a noncommercial registered agent, the address of that noncommercial registered agent in this state.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2007, ch. 99, § 64.

45-10.2-83.
Foreign limited partnership — Merger of foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business in this state.

If a foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business in this state is a party to a statutory merger permitted by the laws of the jurisdiction under which the foreign limited partnership is organized, and the foreign limited partnership is not the surviving organization, then the surviving organization shall, within thirty days after the merger becomes effective, file with the secretary of state a certified statement of merger duly authenticated by the proper officer of the state or country where the statutory merger was effected. Any foreign organization that is the surviving organization in a merger and which will continue to transact business in this state shall procure a certificate of authority if not previously authorized to transact business.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-84.
Foreign limited partnership — Conversion of foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business in this state.

If a foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business in this state converts to another organization permitted by the laws of the jurisdiction under which the foreign limited partnership is organized, then the newly created organization resulting from the conversion shall, within thirty days after the conversion becomes effective, file with the secretary of state a certified statement of conversion duly authenticated by the proper officer of the jurisdiction in which the statutory conversion was effected. Any foreign organization that is the converted organization in a conversion and which will continue to transact business in this state shall obtain a certificate of authority or applicable registration in accordance with the North Dakota laws applicable to the converted organization.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-85.
Foreign limited partnership — Cancellation of certificate of authority — Effect of failure to have certificate.

In order to cancel its certificate of authority to transact business in this state, a foreign limited partnership must deliver to the secretary of state for filing:

A certified notice of cancellation duly authenticated by the proper officer of the state or country where the cancellation was effected;

A certified statement of dissolution duly authenticated by the proper officer of the state or country where the dissolution was effected; or

A statement of withdrawal signed by a general partner.

A foreign limited partnership transacting business in this state may not maintain an action or proceeding in this state unless it has a certificate of authority to transact business in this state.

The failure of a foreign limited partnership to have a certificate of authority to transact business in this state does not impair the validity of a contract or act of the foreign limited partnership or prevent the foreign limited partnership from defending an action or proceeding in this state.

A partner of a foreign limited partnership is not liable for the obligations of the foreign limited partnership solely by reason that the foreign limited partnership has transacted business in this state without a certificate of authority.

If a foreign limited partnership transacts business in this state without a certificate of authority or cancels its certificate of authority, then it appoints the secretary of state as its agent for service of process for rights of action arising out of the transaction of business in this state.

A foreign limited partnership that transacts business in this state without a certificate of authority is liable to the state for the years or parts of years during which the foreign limited partnership transacted business in this state without the certificate of authority in an amount equal to all fees that would have been imposed by this chapter upon that foreign limited partnership had the foreign limited partnership duly obtained a certificate of authority, filed all reports required by this chapter, and paid all penalties imposed by this chapter. The attorney general shall bring proceedings to recover all amounts due this state under this section.

A foreign limited partnership that transacts business in this state without a certificate of authority is subject to a civil penalty, payable to the state, not to exceed five thousand dollars. Each general partner and each agent who authorizes, directs, or participates in the transaction of business in this state on behalf of a foreign limited partnership that has not obtained a certificate of authority is subject to a civil penalty, payable to the state, not to exceed one thousand dollars.

The civil penalties set forth in subsection 7 may be recovered in an action brought within the district court of Burleigh County by the attorney general. Upon a finding by the court that a foreign limited partnership or any of the general partners or agents of the foreign limited partnership have transacted business in this state in violation of this chapter, the court shall issue, in addition to the imposition of a civil penalty, an injunction restraining the further transaction of the business of the foreign limited partnership and further exercise of any rights and privileges by the foreign limited partnership in this state. The foreign limited partnership must be enjoined from transacting business in this state until all civil penalties plus any interest and court costs that the court may assess have been paid and until the foreign limited partnership has otherwise complied with the provisions of this chapter.

The certificate is canceled when the notice of cancellation, statement of dissolution, or statement of withdrawal becomes effective under section 45-10.2-27.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2011, ch. 87, § 64.

45-10.2-86. (903)
Foreign limited partnership — Activities not constituting transacting business.

Activities of a foreign limited partnership which do not constitute transacting business in this state within the meaning of this chapter include:

Maintaining, defending, and settling an action or proceeding;

Holding a meeting of its partners or carrying on any other activity concerning its internal affairs;

Maintaining accounts in financial institutions;

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of the securities of the foreign limited partnership or maintaining trustees or depositories with respect to those securities;

Selling through independent contractors;

Soliciting or obtaining orders, whether by mail or electronic means or through employees or agents or otherwise, if the orders require acceptance outside this state before they become contracts;

Creating or acquiring indebtedness, mortgages, or security interests in real or personal property;

Securing or collecting debts or enforcing mortgages or other security interests in property securing the debts, and holding, protecting, and maintaining property so acquired;

Conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within thirty days and is not one in the course of similar transactions of a like manner; and

Transacting business in interstate commerce.

For purposes of this section, the ownership in this state of income-producing real property or tangible personal property, other than property excluded under subsection 1, constitutes transacting business in this state.

This section does not apply in determining the contacts or activities that may subject a foreign limited partnership to service of process, taxation, or regulation under any other law of this state.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-87.
Foreign limited partnership — Revocation of certificate of authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2007, ch. 99, § 65; 2011, ch. 87, § 65; repealed by 2015, ch. 86, § 24, effective July 1, 2015.

45-10.2-88. (908)
Foreign limited partnership — Action by attorney general.

The attorney general may maintain an action to restrain a foreign limited partnership from transacting business in this state in violation of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-89. (1001)
Direct action by partner.

Subject to subsection 2, a partner may maintain a direct action against the limited partnership or another partner for legal or equitable relief, with or without an accounting to the activities of the partnership, to enforce the rights and otherwise protect the interests of the partner, including rights and interests under the partnership agreement of this chapter or arising independently of the partnership relationship.

A partner commencing a direct action under this section is required to plead and prove an actual or threatened injury that is not solely the result of an injury suffered or threatened to be suffered by the limited partnership.

The accrual of, and any time limitation on, a right of action for a remedy under this section is governed by other law. A right to an accounting upon a dissolution and winding up does not revive a claim barred by law.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-90. (1002)
Derivative action.

A partner may maintain a derivative action to enforce a right of a limited partnership if:

The partner first makes a demand on the general partners, requesting that they cause the limited partnership to bring an action to enforce the right, and the general partners do not bring the action within a reasonable time; or

A demand would be futile.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

Collateral References.

Right of limited partner to maintain derivative action on behalf of partnership, 26 A.L.R.4th 264.

45-10.2-91. (1003)
Proper plaintiff.

A derivative action may be maintained only by a person that is a partner at the time the action is commenced and:

That was a partner when the conduct giving rise to the action occurred; or

Whose status as a partner devolved upon the person by operation of law or pursuant to the terms of the partnership agreement from a person that was a partner at the time of the conduct.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-92. (1004)
Pleading.

In a derivative action, the complaint must state with particularity:

The date and content of the demand of the plaintiff and the response to the demand by the general partners; or

Why demand should be excused as futile.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-93. (1005)
Proceeds and expenses.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2:

Any proceeds or other benefits of a derivative action, whether by judgment, compromise, or settlement, belong to the limited partnership and not to the derivative plaintiff; and

If the derivative plaintiff receives any proceeds, then the derivative plaintiff shall immediately remit them to the limited partnership.

If a derivative action is successful in whole or in part, then the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable fees for services of an attorney, from the recovery of the limited partnership.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.

45-10.2-94. (1102)
Conversion.

An organization other than a limited partnership may convert to a limited partnership, and a limited partnership may convert to another organization other than a general partnership pursuant to this section and sections 45-10.2-95 through 45-10.2-99 and a plan of conversion, if:

The governing statute of the other organization authorizes the conversion;

The conversion is not prohibited by the law of the jurisdiction that enacted the governing statute; and

The other organization complies with its governing statute in effecting the conversion.

For the purposes of sections 45-10.2-94 through 45-10.2-99, unless the context clearly indicates a different meaning is intended:

“Certificate of creation” means:

A certificate of incorporation, if the converted organization is a corporation deemed to be incorporated under chapter 10-19.1;

A certificate of organization, if the converted organization is a limited liability company deemed to be organized under chapter 10-32.1;

A certificate of limited partnership, if the converted organization is a limited partnership deemed to be formed under this chapter;

The filed registration if the converting organization is a limited liability partnership deemed to be established under chapter 45-22; or

A certificate of limited liability limited partnership, if the converted organization is a limited liability limited partnership deemed to be formed under chapter 45-23.

“Date of origin” means the date on which:

A corporation that is:

The converting organization was incorporated; or

The converted organization is deemed to be incorporated;

A limited liability company that is:

The converting organization was organized; or

The converted organization is deemed to be organized;

A general partnership that is the converting organization was formed;

A limited partnership that is:

The converting organization was formed; or

The converted organization is deemed to be formed;

A limited liability partnership that is:

The converting organization was formed; or

The converted organization is deemed to be formed; and

A limited liability limited partnership that is:

The converting organization was formed; or

The converted organization is deemed to be formed.

“Filed registration” means the registration of a limited liability partnership that has been filed with the secretary of state.

“General partnership” shall mean an organization formed under chapters 45-13 through 45-21.

“Organizational records” means for an organization that is:

A corporation, its articles of incorporation and bylaws;

A limited liability company, its articles of organization, operating agreement or bylaws, and any member-control agreement;

A limited partnership, its partnership agreement;

A limited liability partnership, its partnership agreement; or

A limited liability limited partnership, its partnership agreement.

“Originating record” means for an organization that is:

A corporation, its articles of incorporation;

A limited liability company, its articles of organization;

A limited partnership, its certificate of limited partnership;

A limited liability partnership, its registration; or

A limited liability limited partnership, its certificate of limited liability limited partnership.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6; 2015, ch. 87, § 29, effective July 1, 2015.

45-10.2-95.
Plan of conversion.

A plan of conversion must be in a record and must contain:

The name and form of the converting organization before conversion;

The name and form of the converted organization after conversion;

The terms and conditions of the conversion;

The manner and basis for converting each ownership interest in the converting organization into ownership interests in the converted organization, or in whole or in part, into money or other property;

The organizational records of the converted organization; and

Any other provisions with respect to the proposed conversion that are deemed to be necessary or desirable.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 384, § 6.